Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1482YC (3) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 260C.14, subsection 14, paragraph b, 1 Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Adopt rules to classify as residents for purposes of 3 tuition and mandatory fees, qualified veterans and qualified 4 military persons and their spouses , and dependent children , and 5 survivors who are domiciled in this state while enrolled in a 6 community college. A spouse , or dependent child , or survivor 7 of a military person or veteran shall not be deemed a resident 8 under this paragraph âbâ unless the qualified military person or 9 qualified veteran meets the requirements of subparagraph (2), 10 subparagraph division (b) or (c), as appropriate. 11 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âbâ , unless the context 12 otherwise requires: 13 (a) âDependent childâ means a student who was claimed by a 14 qualified military person or qualified veteran as a dependent 15 on the qualified military personâs or qualified veteranâs 16 internal revenue service tax filing for the previous tax year. 17 (b) âQualified military personâ means a person on active 18 duty in the military service of the United States who is 19 stationed in this state or at the Rock Island arsenal. If 20 the qualified military person is transferred, deployed, or 21 restationed while the personâs spouse or dependent child is 22 enrolled in the community college, the spouse or dependent 23 child shall continue to be classified as a resident provided 24 the spouse or dependent child maintains continuous enrollment. 25 (c) âQualified veteranâ means a person , other than 26 a qualified military person, who meets the following 27 requirements: is a veteran as defined in section 35.1, 28 notwithstanding any residency requirement in that section. 29 (i) Is eligible for benefits, or has exhausted the benefits, 30 under the federal Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act 31 of 2008. 32 (ii) Is domiciled in this state, or has resided in this 33 state for at least one year or sufficient time to have filed an 34 Iowa tax return in the preceding twelve months. 35 -1- LSB 1482YC (3) 91 je/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ (d) âSurvivorâ means a student who is the spouse or child of 1 a deceased veteran, as defined in section 35.1. 2 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, subsection 17, paragraph b, Code 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. (1) Adopt rules to classify as residents for purposes of 5 undergraduate tuition and mandatory fees, qualified veterans 6 and qualified military persons and their spouses , and dependent 7 children , and survivors who are domiciled in this state while 8 enrolled in an institution of higher education under the board. 9 A spouse , or dependent child , or survivor of a military person 10 or veteran shall not be deemed a resident under this paragraph 11 âbâ unless the qualified military person or qualified veteran 12 meets the requirements of subparagraph (2), subparagraph 13 division (b) or (c), as appropriate. 14 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âbâ , unless the context 15 otherwise requires: 16 (a) âDependent childâ means a student who was claimed by a 17 qualified military person or qualified veteran as a dependent 18 on the qualified military personâs or qualified veteranâs 19 internal revenue service tax filing for the previous tax year. 20 (b) âQualified military personâ means a person on active 21 duty in the military service of the United States who is 22 stationed in this state or at the Rock Island arsenal. If 23 the qualified military person is transferred, deployed, or 24 restationed while the personâs spouse or dependent child is 25 enrolled in an institution of higher education under the 26 control of the board, the spouse or dependent child shall 27 continue to be classified as a resident provided the spouse or 28 dependent child maintains continuous enrollment. 29 (c) âQualified veteranâ means a person , other than 30 a qualified military person, who meets the following 31 requirements: is a veteran as defined in section 35.1, 32 notwithstanding any residency requirement in that section. 33 (i) Is eligible for benefits, or has exhausted the benefits, 34 under the federal Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act 35 -2- LSB 1482YC (3) 91 je/jh 2/ 3 H.F. _____ of 2008. 1 (ii) Is domiciled in this state, or has resided in this 2 state for at least one year or sufficient time to have filed an 3 Iowa tax return in the preceding twelve months. 4 (d) âSurvivorâ means a student who is the spouse or child of 5 a deceased veteran, as defined in section 35.1. 6